Missouri, session 2026, SB1254.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 336.010, RSMo, is repealed and four
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
334.071, 336.010, 336.022, and 336.300, to read as follows:
334.071. Only physicians licensed under this chapter
shall use the following medical titles or specialty
designations:
(1) "Physician", except individuals licensed under
chapter 331 may use the term "chiropractic physician";
(2) "Doctor of medicine";
(3) "Medical doctor";
(4) "MD";
(5) "Doctor of osteopathic medicine";
(6) "Doctor of osteopathy";
(7) "DO";
(8) "Osteopath";
(9) "Osteopathic physician";
(10) "Osteopathic surgeon";
(11) "Surgeon";
(12) "Anesthesiologist";
(13) "Cardiologist";
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1254 2
(14) "Dermatologist";
(15) "Endocrinologist";
(16) "Emergency physician";
(17) "Family practice physician";
(18) "Gastroenterologist";
(19) "Gynecologist";
(20) "Hematologist";
(21) "Internist";
(22) "Laryngologist";
(23) "Nephrologist";
(24) "Neurologist";
(25) "Neurosurgeon";
(26) "Obstetrician";
(27) "Oncologist";
(28) "Ophthalmologist";
(29) "Orthopedic surgeon";
(30) "Orthopedist";
(31) "Otologist";
(32) "Otolaryngologist";
(33) "Otorhinolaryngologist";
(34) "Pathologist";
(35) "Pediatrician";
(36) "Physiatrist";
(37) "Primary care physician";
(38) "Proctologist";
(39) "Psychiatrist";
(40) "Radiologist";
(41) "Rheumatologist";
(42) "Rhinologist"; and
(43) "Urologist".
336.010. 1. The "practice of optometry" is the
examination, diagnosis, treatment, and preventative care of

SB 1254 3
the eye, adnexa, and vision. The practice includes, but is
not limited to:
(1) The examination of the eye, adnexa, and vision to
determine the accommodative and refractive states, visual
perception, conditions, and diseases;
(2) The diagnosis and treatment of conditions or
diseases of the eye, adnexa, and vision;
(3) The performance of diagnostic procedures and
ordering of laboratory and imaging tests for the diagnosis
of vision and conditions and diseases of the eye and adnexa;
(4) The prescription and administration of
pharmaceutical agents[, excluding injectable agents,] other
than vaccines for the purpose of examination, diagnosis, and
treatment of vision and conditions or diseases of the eye
and adnexa;
(5) The performance of the following procedures:
(a) The removal of superficial foreign bodies from the
eye or adnexa;
(b) The removal of embedded foreign bodies from the
eye or eyelid;
(c) The removal of corneal foreign bodies with or
without a slit lamp and that are equal to or less than one-
third depth off the visual axis;
(d) The removal of damaged or loose corneal epithelium
without the use of a blade;
(e) Epilation only by forceps;
(f) The expression of conjunctival follicles;
(g) The placement of punctal plugs;
(h) The placement of bandage contact lenses;
(i) The placement of self-retaining amniotic membranes;
(j) Procedures employing thermal pulsation and
noninvasive devices delivering intense pulsed light therapy

SB 1254 4
or low-level light therapy that do not rely on laser
technology, limited to the treatment of conditions and
diseases of the adnexa;
(k) Use of an intranasal stimulator in conjunction
with treatment of dry eye syndrome;
(l) The therapeutic release of aqueous through a pre-
existing wound; and
(m) The application of ultraviolet light for
components of light adjustable lens;
(6) The employment of objective or subjective
mechanical means to determine the accommodative or
refractive states of the human eye;
(7) The prescription or adaptation of lenses, prisms,
devices, or ocular exercises to correct defects or abnormal
conditions of the human eye or vision or to adjust the human
eye to special conditions;
(8) The prescription and fitting of ophthalmic or
contact lenses and devices;
(9) The prescription and administration of vision
therapy; and
(10) The prescription and administration of low vision
care.
2. An optometrist may not perform surgery, including
the use of lasers for treatment of any disease or condition
or for the correction of refractive error.
3. As used in this chapter, except as the context may
otherwise require, the following terms mean:
(1) "Eye", the human eye;
(2) "Adnexa", all structures adjacent to the eye and
the conjunctiva, lids, lashes, and lacrimal system;
(3) "Board", the Missouri state board of optometry;

SB 1254 5
(4) "Diagnostic pharmaceutical agents", topically
applied pharmaceuticals used for the purpose of conducting
an examination of the eye, adnexa, and vision;
(5) "Low vision care", the examination, treatment, and
management of patients with visual impairments not treatable
by conventional eyewear or contact lenses and may include a
vision rehabilitation program to enhance remaining vision
skills;
(6) "Pharmaceutical agents", any diagnostic and
therapeutic drug or combination of drugs that assist the
diagnosis, prevention, treatment, or mitigation of abnormal
conditions or symptoms of the human eye, adnexa, and vision;
(7) "Therapeutic pharmaceutical agents", those
pharmaceuticals[, excluding injectable agents,] other than
vaccines used for the treatment of conditions or diseases of
the eye, adnexa, and vision;
(8) "Vision therapy", a treatment regiment to improve
a patient's diagnosed visual dysfunctions, prevent the
development of visual problems, or enhance visual
performance to meet the defined needs of the patient.
336.022. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of
the law to the contrary, an optometrist shall be required to
disclose, either verbally or by written communication, to
every patient of the optometrist that:
(1) The optometrist is not a physician licensed by
chapter 334;
(2) The patient has the option to seek care from a
physician for treatments; and
(3) The patient has waived a referral to a physician.
2. An optometrist shall be required to obtain from a
patient informed written consent prior to the treatment of
such patient. The optometrist shall retain records of the

SB 1254 6
written consent for no less than seven years from the date
the written consent was made by the patient. The records of
written consent of patients of an optometrist shall be made
available upon request for review by the board and the state
board of registration for the healing arts. Failure to
obtain informed written consent of the patient prior to
treatment may result in disciplinary action, including the
revocation or suspension of a license by the board under
section 336.
336.300. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Ancillary personnel", a person who is not an eye
care provider;
(2) "Comanagement safe harbor", protection from
disciplinary proceedings against an eye care provider with
respect to surgical comanagement of an eye surgery patient
when the eye care provider adheres to the requirements of
this section;
(3) "Eye care provider", an ophthalmologist or
optometrist;
(4) "Eye surgery patient", a patient who has an eye
surgery performed by a licensed physician or surgeon;
(5) "Ophthalmologist", a physician licensed under
chapter 334 who specializes in care of the eye and who has
completed a residency in ophthalmology accredited by the
Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education;
(6) "Optometrist", an optometrist licensed to practice
under this chapter;
(7) "Surgical comanagement", the collaboration and
sharing of responsibilities among eye care providers with
respect to the preoperative or postoperative care of an eye
surgery patient. The term "surgical comanagement" shall not

SB 1254 7
include delegating tasks relating to the care of an eye
surgery patient to ancillary personnel working under the
direct supervision of an eye care provider.
2. Surgical comanagement is permitted when the
following are met:
(1) The eye surgery patient has indicated a preference
to have preoperative or postoperative care furnished by an
eye care provider other than the operating physician or
surgeon; or
(2) The distance from the eye surgery patient's home
to the operating physician or surgeon's office would result
in an unreasonable hardship for the eye surgery patient; or
(3) Extenuating circumstances exist which prevent the
eye surgery patient from visiting the physician or surgeon's
office for routine preoperative or postoperative care and
such care can be provided by another qualified eye care
provider; or
(4) The physician or surgeon chosen by the eye surgery
patient is not available to perform the operation and
associated care within a reasonable proximity to the eye
surgery patient's home; or
(5) The operating physician or surgeon will not be
available to provide postoperative care after the surgery,
provided that the absence of the operating physician or
surgeon does not fall within rules pertaining to patient
abandonment or improper itinerant surgery; and
(6) The eye surgery patient chooses to have
preoperative or postoperative care furnished by an eye care
provider other than the operating physician or surgeon after
being fully informed about the proposed comanagement
arrangement as described in subsection 5 of this section.

SB 1254 8
3. None of the comanaging eye care providers shall
receive a percentage of the global surgical fee that exceeds
the relative value of services provided to an eye surgery
patient which are reasonable and necessary for such eye
surgery patient's care.
4. Each comanaging eye care provider shall be licensed
or certified and qualified for the services the eye care
provider provides to an eye surgery patient. If surgical
intervention is required during the postoperative period for
medically necessary reasons, an eye surgery patient shall be
referred back to the original operating physician or surgeon
or to another physician or surgeon with comparable skills.
5. An eye surgery patient or legal guardian of an eye
surgery patient shall be fully informed in writing about the
surgical comanagement arrangement and shall sign and be
offered to receive a statement acknowledging that the
details of the surgical comanagement arrangement have been
fully explained to the eye surgery patient, including all of
the following:
(1) The licensure and qualifications of the comanaging
eye care providers who will be managing the eye surgery
patient's care preoperatively, during the operation, and
postoperatively;
(2) The financial arrangement between the comanaging
eye care providers, including the division of the global
surgical fee among the eye care providers participating in
the surgical comanagement arrangement;
(3) The eye surgery patient's right to receive care
from any of the comanaging eye care providers that they are
licensed and qualified to provide; and

SB 1254 9
(4) The eye surgery patient's right to accept or
decline to participate in the surgical comanagement
arrangement.
The comanagement informed consent shall be documented in the
eye surgery patient's medical records maintained by each of
the comanaging eye care providers, including the eye surgery
patient's acknowledgment of and agreement to the surgical
comanagement arrangement.
6. The comanaging eye care providers shall establish
protocols governing the manner in which care will be offered
and provided to an eye surgery patient, including but not
limited to:
(1) The nature of routine care expected;
(2) Who will deliver each aspect of care;
(3) How complications will be handled;
100 (4) The parameters which will determine when an eye
101 surgery patient is fully healed and may be released from
102 further care, and how the release will be accomplished; and
103 (5) The manner in which communication between the eye
104 care providers will occur.
105 7. Comanaging eye care providers shall communicate
106 regularly and in a timely manner consistent with the
107 comanagement surgical protocol procedures established in
108 subsection 6 of this section regarding an eye surgery
109 patient's care and progress during the postoperative period
110 or until the eye surgery patient is released from further
111 care.
112 8. (1) Any person who engages in the following acts
113 shall not receive the protection of the comanagement safe
114 harbor:

SB 1254 10
115 (a) Entering into a surgical comanagement arrangement
116 for the purpose of splitting a fee without providing a
117 commensurate medically necessary service to an eye surgery
118 patient;
119 (b) Demanding to manage the postoperative care in
120 return for making a surgical referral;
121 (c) Threatening to withhold referrals to a surgeon who
122 does not agree to comanage an eye surgery patient;
123 (d) Offering to comanage a patient in return for
124 receiving a surgical referral;
125 (e) Intentionally referring an eye surgery patient for
126 surgery in a manner that has no other legitimate purpose
127 than to justify a surgical comanagement arrangement;
128 (f) Initiating a surgical comanagement arrangement
129 when an eye surgery patient otherwise would have been
130 released from further care following surgery;
131 (g) Failing to fully inform an eye surgery patient
132 about the surgical comanagement arrangement;
133 (h) Misleading an eye surgery patient as to the
134 appropriateness of surgical comanagement for their
135 particular circumstances or leading the eye surgery patient
136 to believe that the eye surgery patient does not have the
137 right to receive postoperative care from the operating
138 surgeon or other comanaging eye care providers;
139 (i) Any other act that is not in the best interest of
140 the eye surgery patient as determined by the eye care
141 provider's respective licensing board.
142 (2) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to
143 infringe upon an eye care provider's prerogative to
144 recommend a physician or surgeon or refer an eye surgery
145 patient to a physician or surgeon based on that eye care
146 provider's opinion or assessment of the physician or

SB 1254 11
147 surgeon's ability or fitness to provide appropriate surgical
148 care to the eye surgery patient.
149 9. The state board of registration for the healing
150 arts shall be responsible for enforcement of the provisions
151 of this section for ophthalmologist and other physicians or
152 surgeons licensed pursuant to chapter 334.
153 10. The board shall be responsible for enforcement of
154 the provisions of this section for optometrists.
155 11. The state board of registration for the healing
156 arts may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of
157 this section as it affects licensees pursuant to chapter
158 334. The board may promulgate rules to implement the
159 provisions of this section as it affects licensees pursuant
160 to this chapter. To the extent possible and appropriate,
161 the board of registration for the healing arts and the board
162 shall coordinate the content of any rules they may adopt.
163 Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
164 section 536.010, that is created under the authority
165 delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
166 complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
167 chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
168 section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
169 powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
170 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
171 and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
172 then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
173 or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
174 12. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
175 infringe upon the right of any eye care provider to decide
176 whether or not to participate in comanagement arrangements
177 either as a matter of policy or in a particular instance.

SB 1254 12
178 13. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
179 limit civil liability of a physician or an optometrist with
180 respect to any aspect of patient care.
✓